North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-19.1 Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors

43-19.1-01.
General provisions.

In order to safeguard life, health, and property, and to promote the public welfare, the practice of engineering and land surveying in this state is hereby declared to be subject to regulation in the public interest, and it hereby is declared necessary that a state board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors be established, which in the exercise of its powers is deemed to be an administrative agency within the purview of chapter 28-32. It is unlawful for any person to practice, or to offer to practice, professional engineering or land surveying in this state, as defined in the provisions of this chapter, or to use in connection with the person’s name or otherwise assume, or advertise any title or description tending to convey the impression that the person is an engineer or land surveyor, unless such person has been duly registered or exempted under the provisions of this chapter. The right to engage in the practice of engineering or land surveying is deemed a personal right, based on the qualifications of the individual as evidenced by the individual’s certificate of registration, which is not transferable.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 1.

Collateral References.

Engineering services: what amounts to architectural or engineering services within license requirements, 82 A.L.R.2d 1013.

Compensation: right of architect or engineer licensed in one state to recover compensation for services rendered in another state, or in connection with construction in another state, where he is not licensed in the latter state, 32 A.L.R.3d 1151.

Liability or indemnity policy on civil engineer, architect or the like, construction and application of, 83 A.L.R.3d 539, section 4 superseded by 14 A.L.R.5th 695.

Event triggering liability insurance coverage as occurring within period of time covered by liability insurance policy where injury or damage is delayed—modern cases, 14 A.L.R.5th 695.

43-19.1-02.
Definitions.

In this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the state board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors.

“Engineer” means a professional engineer.

“Engineer intern” means an individual who complies with the requirements for education, experience, and character and who has passed an examination in the fundamental engineering subjects, as provided in sections 43-19.1-12 and 43-19.1-15.

“Engineering surveys” means all survey activities required to support the sound conception, planning, design, construction, maintenance, and operation of engineered projects, which include locating or laying out alignments, positions, or elevations for the construction of fixed works. The term does not include the surveying of real property for the establishment of land boundaries, rights of way, easements, and the dependent or independent surveys or resurveys of the public land survey system.

“Land surveyor” means an individual engaged in the practice of land surveying.

“Land surveyor intern” means an individual who complies with the requirements for education, experience, and character and who has passed an examination in the fundamentals of mathematics and the basic principles of land surveying as required in this chapter and as established by the board.

“Practice of engineering and practice of professional engineering” means any service or creative work, the adequate performance of which requires engineering education, training, and experience in the application of special knowledge of the mathematical, physical, and engineering sciences to such services or creative work as consultation, investigation, evaluation, planning and design of engineering works and systems, engineering teaching of advanced engineering subjects or courses related thereto, engineering surveys, and the inspection of construction for the purpose of assuring compliance with drawings and specifications; any of which embraces such service or work, either public or private, in connection with any utilities, structures, buildings, machines, equipment, processes, work systems, or projects as are incidental to the practice of engineering. A person must be construed to practice or offer to practice engineering if the person practices any branch of the profession of engineering; if the person, by verbal claim, sign, advertisement, letterhead, card, or in any other way represents that the person is an engineer and is able to practice engineering in this state if the person through the use of some other title implies that the person is an engineer or that the person is registered under this chapter; or if the person holds out as able to perform, or does perform any engineering service or work or any other service that is recognized as engineering, for a valuable consideration for others, including the public at large.

“Practice of land surveying”:

Means making land boundary determinations by providing or offering to provide professional services using such sciences as mathematics, geodesy, and photogrammetry and involving the making of geometric measurements and gathering related information pertaining to the physical or legal features of the earth; improvements on the earth; and improvements on the space above, on, or below the earth and providing, utilizing, or developing the same into land survey products such as graphics, data, maps, plans, reports, descriptions, or projects. As used in this subsection, professional services include acts of consultation, investigation, testimony evaluation, expert technical testimony, planning, mapping, assembling, and interpreting gathered measurements and information related to any one or more of the following:

Determining by measurement the configuration or contour of the earth’s surface or the position of fixed objects on the earth’s surface;

Determining by performing geodetic land surveys the size and shape of the earth or the position of any point on the earth;

Locating, relocating, establishing, re-establishing, or retracing property lines or boundaries of any tract of land, road, right of way, or easement;

Making any land survey for the division, subdivision, or consolidation of any tract of land;

Locating or laying out alignments, positions, or elevations for the construction of fixed works;

Determining by the use of principles of land surveying the position for any survey monument, boundary or nonboundary, or reference point and establishing or replacing any such monument or reference point; and

Creating, preparing, or modifying electronic or computerized or other data for the purpose of making land boundary determinations relative to the performance of the activities in paragraphs 1 through 6.

Includes:

Engaging in land surveying;

By verbal claim, sign, advertisement, letterhead, card, or any other way representing to a person to be a professional land surveyor;

Through the use of some other title implying to be a professional land surveyor or that the person is licensed or authorized under this chapter; and

Holding out as able to perform or performing any land surveying service or work or any other service designated by the practitioner which is recognized as land surveying.

“Professional engineer” means an individual who by reason of special knowledge or use of the mathematical, physical, and engineering sciences and the principles and methods of engineering analysis and design, acquired by engineering education and engineering experience, is qualified to practice engineering, and who has been registered and licensed by the state board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors.

“Professional land surveyor” means a land surveyor who complies with the requirements for education, experience, and character and who has been registered and licensed by the board.

“Responsible charge” means direct control and personal supervision of engineering or surveying work.

“Retired registrant” means a duly registered professional engineer or land surveyor who is not engaged in active professional practice and is not required to meet the continuing professional education requirements as prescribed by the board. A retired registrant is issued a certificate of registration indicating “retired” status.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 2; 1983, ch. 482, § 2; 2003, ch. 363, § 1; 2009, ch. 368, § 1; 2011, ch. 314, § 1.

43-19.1-03.
Board — Appointments — Terms.

A state board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors is hereby created the duty of which is to administer this chapter. The board consists of one professional land surveyor and four professional engineers. The board members who are professional engineers must be appointed by the governor from among a list of nominees submitted to the governor by the North Dakota society of professional engineers who must have the qualifications required by section 43-19.1-04, such list must include the names of at least three nominees for each vacancy to be filled. The governor shall appoint the professional land surveyor member of the board from a list of nominees submitted by the North Dakota society of professional land surveyors. The list must include the names of at least three nominees for the vacancy to be filled. The members must possess the qualifications required by section 43-19.1-04. The members of the board must be appointed for five-year terms that are staggered so the term of one member expires June thirtieth of each year. Each member of the board shall receive a certificate of appointment from the governor and shall file with the secretary of state a written oath or affirmation for the faithful discharge of the member’s official duties. On the expiration of the term of any member, the governor shall appoint for a term of five years a board member having the qualifications required in section 43-19.1-04 to take the place of the member whose term on the board is about to expire. A member may be reappointed. Each member shall hold office until the expiration of the term for which appointed or until a successor has been duly appointed and has qualified.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 3; 1983, ch. 481, § 1; 2009, ch. 368, § 2.

Cross-References.

Oath of civil officers, see N.D.C.C. § 44-01-05.

43-19.1-04.
Board — Qualifications.

Each professional engineer board member must be a professional engineer who is a citizen and resident of this state, has been registered in this state a minimum of eight years, has been engaged in the lawful practice of engineering for at least twelve years, and has had responsible charge of important engineering work for at least five years. Each professional land surveyor board member must be a professional land surveyor who is a citizen and resident of this state, has been registered as a professional land surveyor in this state a minimum of eight years, and has been responsible for important land surveying work for at least five years.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 4; 1983, ch. 481, § 2; 2009, ch. 368, § 3.

43-19.1-05.
Board — Compensation and expenses.

Each member of the board is entitled to receive per diem, in an amount established by the board which may not exceed one hundred thirty-five dollars, when attending to the work of the board or any of the board’s committees and for the time spent in necessary travel and is entitled to be reimbursed for all actual traveling, incidental, and clerical expenses necessarily incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 5; 1977, ch. 404, § 1; 2009, ch. 368, § 4.

Cross-References.

Advances for travel expenses, see N.D.C.C. § 44-08-04.2.

Claims for travel expenses, see N.D.C.C. § 44-08-04.

Limitation on claims for travel expenses, see N.D.C.C. § 44-08-03.

Mileage and travel expenses of state officers and employees, see N.D.C.C. § 54-06-09.

Per diem allowance for long-term travel, see N.D.C.C. § 44-08-04.1.

43-19.1-06.
Board — Removal of members — Vacancies.

The governor may remove any member of the board for misconduct, incompetency, neglect of duty, or for any sufficient cause, in the manner prescribed by law for removal of state officials. Vacancies in the membership of the board must be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the governor as provided in section 43-19.1-03.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 6.

Cross-References.

Removal of officers by governor, see N.D.C.C. ch. 44-11.

43-19.1-07.
Board — Organization and meetings.

The board shall hold at least two regular meetings each year. The board shall elect or appoint annually the following officers: a chairman, a vice chairman, and a secretary. A quorum of the board consists of not fewer than three members.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 7; 2009, ch. 368, § 5.

43-19.1-08.
Board — Powers.

The board may:

Adopt and amend all bylaws, rules of procedure, and regulations to administer and carry out the provisions of this chapter and for the conduct of the board’s affairs and functions which may be reasonably necessary for the proper performance of the board’s duties and the regulation of the board’s proceedings, meetings, records, and examinations and the conduct thereof, and to adopt a code of ethics that must be binding upon all persons registered under or subject to this chapter.

Adopt and have an official seal, which must be affixed to each certificate issued.

Employ such clerks, technical experts, and attorneys as the board determines necessary or desirable to carry out this chapter.

Hold hearings, administer oaths, and take and record testimony; under the hand of the board’s chairman and the seal of the board, subpoena witnesses and compel the witnesses’ attendance; require the submission of books, papers, documents, or other pertinent data in any disciplinary matters, or in any case when a violation of this chapter or of the rules or regulations adopted by the board is alleged; and make findings, orders, and determinations that have the force and effect of law which are subject to review by the courts of this state in the manner provided by chapter 28-32. Upon failure or refusal of any person to comply with any such order of the board or to honor the board’s subpoena, the board may apply to a court of any jurisdiction to enforce compliance with the order or subpoena.

Apply in the name of the state for relief by injunction, without bond, to enforce the provisions of this chapter or to restrain any violation of this chapter. In such proceedings, it is not necessary to allege or prove, either that an adequate remedy at law does not exist or that substantial or irreparable damage would result from the continued violation thereof. The members of the board are not personally liable under this proceeding.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 8; 2009, ch. 368, § 6.

Cross-References.

Administrative Agencies Practice Act, see N.D.C.C. ch. 28-32.

43-19.1-09.
Receipts and disbursements.

The secretary of the board shall receive and account for all moneys derived under the provisions of this chapter and shall deposit and disburse the money derived under this chapter in accordance with section 54-44-12. The secretary shall give a surety bond to the state in such sum as may be required by the board. The premium on the bond is a proper and necessary expense of the board. The secretary shall receive such salary as the board shall determine. The board shall employ clerical or other assistants as are necessary for the proper performance of the board’s work and shall make expenditures of this fund for any purpose the board determines is reasonably necessary for the proper performance of the board’s duties under this chapter, including the expenses of the board’s delegates to meetings of and membership fees to the national council of examiners for engineering and surveying and any of the organization’s subdivisions. Under no circumstances may the total amount of warrants issued in payment of the expenses and compensation provided for in this chapter exceed the amount of moneys collected.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 9; 1971, ch. 510, § 10; 1975, ch. 258, § 23; 2009, ch. 368, § 7.

Cross-References.

Bonding of civil officers, see N.D.C.C. §§ 44-01-11, 44-01-12, and 44-01-14 and N.D.C.C. ch. 26.1-21.

43-19.1-10.
Records and reports.

The board shall:

Keep a record of the board’s proceedings and of all applications for registration. The record must show the name, age, and last-known address of each applicant; the date of application, the place of business of such applicant, the applicant’s education, experience, and other qualifications; type of examination required; whether the applicant was rejected; whether a certificate of registration was granted; the date of the action of the board; and such other information as may be deemed necessary by the board. The record of the board is prima facie evidence of the proceeding of the board and a transcript of board proceedings which is certified by the secretary under seal is admissible as evidence with the same force and effect as if the original were produced.

Annually, in compliance with state law, submit a report of the board’s transactions of the preceding year.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 10; 2009, ch. 368, § 8.

Cross-References.

Admissibility of public records, see N.D.R.Ev. 1005.

43-19.1-11.
Roster.

A complete roster showing the names and last-known addresses of all professional engineers and land surveyors must be made available by the secretary of the board at intervals as established by board regulations. Copies of this roster must be made available to each registrant and all county auditors and city auditors and may be distributed or sold to the public.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 11; 2009, ch. 368, § 9.

43-19.1-12.
General requirements for registration.

To be eligible for registration as a professional engineer or land surveyor or for certification as an engineer intern or land surveyor intern, an applicant must be of good character and reputation and shall submit a written application to the board containing such information as the board may require together with five references, three of which references must be professional engineers in the case of engineers or three of which references must be professional land surveyors in the case of land surveyors, having personal knowledge of the applicant’s engineering or land surveying experience, or in the case of an application for certification as an engineer intern or land surveyor intern, by three character references.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 12; 1983, ch. 482, § 3; 2009, ch. 368, § 10.

43-19.1-12.1.
Conviction not bar to registration — Exceptions.

Conviction of an offense does not disqualify an individual from registration under this chapter unless the board determines that the offense has a direct bearing upon an individual’s ability to serve the public as an engineer or land surveyor or that following conviction of any offense the individual is not sufficiently rehabilitated under section 12.1-33-02.1.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 130, § 35; 2009, ch. 368, § 11.

Cross-References.

Definition of offense, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-01-04.

43-19.1-13.
Registration without examination — Professional engineers.

An applicant otherwise qualified must be admitted to registration as a professional engineer without examination if the applicant is:

An individual holding a certificate of registration to engage in the practice of engineering, on the basis of comparable qualifications, issued to that applicant by a proper authority of a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or any foreign country and who, in the opinion of the board, based upon verified evidence, meets the requirements of this chapter; or

An individual registered as a professional engineer by the state of North Dakota under chapter 43-19, on the thirtieth day of June 1967.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 13; 2009, ch. 368, § 12.

Note.

Chapter 43-19, referred to in subsection 2 of this section, has been repealed.

Collateral References.

“Grandfather clause” of statute or ordinance regulating or licensing business or occupation, 4 A.L.R.2d 667.

Compensation: right of architect or engineer licensed in one state to recover compensation for services rendered in another state, or in connection with construction in another state, where he is not licensed in the latter state, 32 A.L.R.3d 1151.

43-19.1-14.
Registration with examination — Professional engineers.

An applicant otherwise qualified must be admitted to registration as a professional engineer if the applicant has successfully passed a written examination of at least eight hours in the principles and practice of engineering, as prescribed by the board, and has one of the following additional qualifications:

Is an engineer intern with a baccalaureate degree in engineering from an institution offering accredited programs approved by the board as being of satisfactory standing, who has a specific record of an additional four years or more of experience in engineering work of a grade and character which indicates to the board that the applicant may be competent to practice engineering.

Is an engineer intern with a baccalaureate degree in engineering from a program that is not accredited but is approved by the board, who has eight years or more of progressive experience in engineering work of a character and grade which indicates to the board that the applicant is competent to practice engineering.

Is an engineer intern with a specific record of at least twenty years of lawful practice in engineering work during at least ten years of which the applicant has been in responsible charge of important engineering work which is of a grade and character that indicates to the board that the applicant is competent to practice engineering, who has been approved for the fundamentals of engineering examination by the board before July 1, 2004, and who holds a valid engineer intern certificate as of January 1, 2006.

Is an engineer intern who meets one of the educational requirements listed in subsection 1, 2, or 5, who has been a teacher of engineering in a college or university offering an approved engineering curriculum of four years or more, and who has had a minimum of two years of nonteaching engineering experience that is of a character and grade that indicates to the board that the applicant is competent to practice engineering.

Is an engineer intern with a baccalaureate degree in an engineering-related program, who has at least twelve years of progressive experience in engineering work of a character and grade which indicates to the board that the applicant is competent to practice engineering.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 14; 2003, ch. 363, §§ 2, 3; 2009, ch. 368, § 13; 2011, ch. 315, § 1.

43-19.1-15.
Additional qualifications of engineer interns.

Except in the case of an individual who filed an application before July 1, 1967, and any subsequent reapplication by such individual, an applicant otherwise qualified must be admitted to certification as an engineer intern. An engineer intern is an individual who has:

A baccalaureate degree in engineering from an institution that offers accredited programs approved by the board and has passed the board’s written examination of at least eight hours in the fundamentals of engineering shall be certified or enrolled as an engineer intern.

A baccalaureate degree in engineering from a program that is not accredited but is approved by the board, who has a specific record of at least four years of experience in engineering work of a grade and character satisfactory to the board, and who passes the board’s written examination of at least eight hours in the fundamentals of engineering.

A baccalaureate degree in an engineering-related program, who has a specific record of at least six years of experience in engineering work of a grade and character satisfactory to the board, and who passes the board’s written examination of at least eight hours in the fundamentals of engineering.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 15; 2003, ch. 363, § 4; 2009, ch. 368, § 14.

43-19.1-16.
Registration — Professional land surveyor.

An individual who shows, to the satisfaction of the board, that the individual is otherwise qualified and is over the age of eighteen years is eligible for registration as a professional land surveyor, if the individual has passed a board-approved examination regarding state laws and rules or other surveying issues specific to the state and:

Holds a certificate of registration to engage in the practice of land surveying issued by proper authority of a state, territory, possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or any foreign country, based on requirements and qualifications as shown by the individual’s application which, in the opinion of the board, are equal to or higher than the requirements of this chapter;

Holds a certificate as a land surveyor intern issued by the board and:

In addition to experience that may be required to qualify for certification as a land surveyor intern, completed at least four years of land surveying experience of a character satisfactory to the board; and

Passed a board-approved written examination in the principles and practice of land surveying; or

Is registered as a land surveyor by the state of North Dakota, under the provisions of former chapter 43-24, on the thirtieth day of June 1967.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 16; 1973, ch. 120, § 49; 2009, ch. 368, § 15; 2019, ch. 358, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Note.

Chapter 43-24, referred to in subsection 4 of this section, has been repealed.

Collateral References.

“Grandfather clause” of statute or ordinance regulating or licensing business or occupation, 4 A.L.R.2d 667.

Compensation: right of architect or engineer licensed in one state to recover compensation for services rendered in another state, or in connection with construction in another state, where he is not licensed in the latter state, 32 A.L.R.3d 1151.

43-19.1-16.1.
Qualifications of land surveyor interns. [Repealed effective July 1, 2028]

Before July 1, 2028, an applicant for certification as a land surveyor intern may qualify for certification by meeting the requirements of this section or section 43-19.1-16.2. After June 30, 2028, a qualified applicant for certification as a land surveyor intern must meet the requirements of section 43-19.1-16.2.

An applicant for certification as a land surveyor intern who has at least four years of qualifying land surveying experience of a character satisfactory to the board, of which a formal education in an accredited engineering or land surveying curriculum may constitute a part, may receive from the board, upon passing a written examination on the fundamentals of mathematics and the basic principles of land surveying, a certificate stating the applicant has passed the examination and been recorded as a land surveyor intern.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 482, § 1; 2009, ch. 368, § 16; 2019, ch. 358, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

43-19.1-16.1.
Qualifications of land surveyor interns. [Repealed effective July 1, 2028]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 482, § 1; 2009, ch. 368, § 16; 2019, ch. 358, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; repealed by 2019, ch. 358, § 4, effective July 1, 2028.

43-19.1-16.2.
Qualifications of land surveyor interns.

The board shall certify as a land surveyor intern an otherwise qualified applicant who has passed a board-approved written examination on the fundamentals of mathematics and the basic principles of land surveying and:

Has a baccalaureate degree in land surveying from an institution that offers board-approved accredited programs;

Has a baccalaureate degree in a board-approved program other than land surveying and:

Has board-approved educational training in land surveying in connection with the baccalaureate degree or other program; and

Has at least two years of qualifying land surveying experience of a character satisfactory to the board;

Has an associate degree in land surveying from a board-approved program and has at least two years of qualifying land surveying experience of a character satisfactory to the board; or

Has a certificate in land surveying from an institution that offers a board-approved program and has at least four years of qualifying land surveying experience of a character satisfactory to the board.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 358, § 3, effective August 1, 2019.

43-19.1-17.
Application for registration.

Application for registration as a professional engineer or land surveyor or for certification as an engineer intern or land surveyor intern must be on a form prescribed and furnished by the board containing statements made under oath, showing the applicant’s education, a detailed summary of the applicant’s technical experience, and references as required by this chapter and must be accompanied by registration fees.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 17; 1983, ch. 482, § 4; 2009, ch. 368, § 17.

43-19.1-17.1.
Retired registrant.

The board may recognize an individual who is no longer practicing as an engineer or land surveyor as a retired registrant.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 368, § 32.

43-19.1-18.
Registration fees.

The board shall establish registration fees for professional engineers, land surveyors, engineer interns, and land surveyor interns in the amount the board determines necessary to accomplish the purposes of the board as provided in this chapter. The registration fees may not exceed the amount of one hundred dollars for a one-year period or two hundred dollars for a two-year period. If the board denies the issuance of a certificate to an applicant, the fee paid may be retained as an application fee.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 18; 1977, ch. 404, § 2; 1983, ch. 482, § 5; 1997, ch. 374, § 1; 2003, ch. 364, § 1; 2009, ch. 368, § 18.

43-19.1-19.
Examinations.

Written examinations must be held at such times and places as the board shall determine. Examinations required on fundamental engineering or land surveying subjects may be taken at any time prescribed by the board. The final examinations may not be taken until the applicant has completed a period of engineering or land surveying experience as provided in this chapter. The board shall establish the minimum passing grade on any examination. A candidate failing one examination may apply for re-examination, which may be granted upon payment of a fee established by the board. Any candidate for registration having an average grade that does not meet the standards set by the board may not apply for re-examination for one year from the date of such examination.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 19; 1977, ch. 404, § 3; 2009, ch. 368, § 19.

43-19.1-20.
Certificates.

The board shall issue a certificate of registration upon payment of the registration fee as provided for in this chapter to any applicant who in the opinion of the board has met the requirements of this chapter. Enrollment cards must be issued to those who qualify as engineer interns or land surveyor interns. Certificates of registration must carry the designation “professional engineer” or “professional land surveyor”, must show the full name of the registrant without any titles, must be numbered, and must be signed by the chairman and the secretary under seal of the board. The issuance of a certificate of registration by the board is prima facie evidence the individual named on the certificate is entitled to all rights and privileges of a professional engineer or land surveyor during the term of which the certificate providing the same has not been revoked or suspended.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 20; 1983, ch. 482, § 6; 2009, ch. 368, § 20.

43-19.1-21.
Seals.

Each registrant under this chapter upon registration may obtain a seal of the design authorized by the board, bearing the registrant’s name, registration number, and the legend “registered professional engineer” or “registered professional land surveyor”. Final engineering drawings, specifications, maps, plats, reports, or other documents prepared by a person required to be registered under this chapter, when presented to a client, contractor, subconsultant, or any public agency, must be signed, dated, and stamped with the seal or facsimile of the seal. A working drawing or unfinished document must contain a statement to the effect the drawing or document is preliminary and not for construction, recording purposes, or implementation. It is unlawful for a registrant to affix or permit the registrant’s seal and signature or facsimiles thereof to be affixed to any engineering drawings, specifications, maps, plats, reports, or other documents after the expiration or revocation or during the suspension of a certificate, or for the purpose of aiding and abetting any other person to evade or attempt to evade any provision of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 21; 2009, ch. 368, § 21.

43-19.1-22.
Expirations and renewals.

A certificate of registration expires on December thirty-first of the year of issuance if registration is on an annual basis and of the year after issuance if issued on a biennial basis and becomes invalid after that date unless renewed. The secretary of the board shall notify every registrant under this chapter of the date of the expiration of the registrant’s certificate of registration and the amount of fee required for its renewal. The notice must be mailed to the registrant at the registrant’s last-known address at least one month in advance of the expiration of the registrant’s certificate. Renewal may be effected at any time before or during the month of December by the payment of a fee as established by the board, not to exceed the fees established in section 43-19.1-18. Renewal of an expired certificate may be effected under rules adopted by the board regarding requirements for re-examination and penalty fees.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 22; 1997, ch. 374, § 2; 2009, ch. 368, § 22.

43-19.1-23.
Reissuance of certificates.

A new certificate of registration to replace any certificate lost, destroyed, or mutilated may be issued subject to the rules of the board. The board may establish a reasonable charge for such issuance.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 23; 2009, ch. 368, § 23.

43-19.1-24.
Code of ethics.

The board shall cause to have prepared and shall adopt a code of ethics, a copy of which must be made available to every registrant and applicant for registration under this chapter, and which must be published in the roster provided under this chapter. Such publication constitutes due notice to all registrants. The board may revise and amend this code of ethics from time to time and shall notify each registrant of such revisions or amendments. The code of ethics applies to all certificate holders, including specialists in a particular branch of the engineering or surveying profession.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 24; 2009, ch. 368, § 24.

43-19.1-24.1.
Engineer not liable for contractor’s fault unless responsibility assumed — Liability for own negligence.

An engineer is not liable for the safety of persons or property on or about a construction project site, or for the construction techniques, procedures, sequences and schedules, or for the conduct, action, errors, or omissions of any construction contractor, subcontractor, or material supplier, their agents or employees, unless the engineer assumes responsibility therefor by contract or by the engineer’s actual conduct. Nothing herein may be construed to relieve an engineer from liability for negligence, whether in the engineer’s design work or otherwise.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 529, § 1.

43-19.1-25.
Disciplinary action — Revocations, suspensions, or reprimand.

The board may suspend, refuse to renew, or revoke the certificate of registration of and may reprimand any registrant. These powers apply to any registrant who is found guilty of any of the following:

The practice of any fraud or deceit in obtaining a certificate of registration.

Any gross negligence, incompetence, or misconduct in the practice of engineering or land surveying.

Any offense determined by the board to have a direct bearing upon an individual’s ability to serve the public as a professional engineer and land surveyor; or when the board determines, following conviction of any offense, that an individual is not sufficiently rehabilitated under section 12.1-33-02.1.

The violation of the code of ethics adopted by the board.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 25; 1977, ch. 130, § 36; 2003, ch. 364, § 2; 2009, ch. 368, § 25; 2015, ch. 299, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Cross-References.

Definition of offense, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-01-04.

Partnerships and corporations subject to disciplinary proceedings, see N.D.C.C. § 43-19.1-27.

Collateral References.

Nolo contendere or non vult, statute authorizing revocation of license upon conviction as applicable to conviction based on plea of, 89 A.L.R.2d 540.

Disqualification, for bias or interest, of member of occupation or profession sitting in license revocation proceeding, 97 A.L.R.2d 1210.

Revocation or suspension of license of professional engineer, 64 A.L.R.3d 509.

43-19.1-26.
Disciplinary action — Procedure.

Any person may file charges of fraud, deceit, gross negligence, incompetence, misconduct, or violation of the code of ethics against any individual registrant. Such charges must be in writing and must be filed with the secretary of the board. All charges, unless dismissed by the board as unfounded or trivial, must be heard by the board within six months following the filing of charges unless the accused registrant waives this requirement. The matters considered at the hearing must include all charges made in the original filing, together with any related or additional matters or charges that arise in connection with the investigation of the original charges, and which are set forth in a specification of issues for the hearing. The time and place for the hearing must be fixed by the board and a copy of the charges, together with a notice of the time and place of hearing, and a specification of the issues to be considered at the hearing must be served upon the accused registrant either personally or sent by registered mail to the last-known address of the registrant at least thirty days before the date fixed for hearing. At any hearing the accused registrant has the right to appear in person or by counsel, or both; to cross-examine witnesses appearing against the accused; and to produce evidence and witnesses in defense of the accused. If the accused fails or refuses to appear, the board may proceed to hear and determine the validity of the issues set forth in the specification of issues. Following the hearing, the board members who did not serve on the investigative panel shall deliberate in executive session and if a majority of the board members who did not serve on the investigative panel vote in favor of sustaining all or part of the issues set forth in the specification of issues, the board shall make findings of fact and conclusions of law and shall issue the board’s order and serve the findings, conclusions, and order upon the accused. In the order the board may reprimand, suspend, refuse to renew, or revoke the accused registrant’s certificate of registration. Any registrant who feels aggrieved by any action of the board in denying, suspending, refusing to renew, or revoking that registrant’s certificate of registration may appeal the board’s action to the district court under the procedures provided by chapter 28-32.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 26; 2009, ch. 368, § 26; 2015, ch. 299, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.